Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 SF 2341 (2) 91 ms/js/mb S.F. 2341 Section 1. Section 331.212, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. Approval of board proceedings to be 3 published pursuant to section 349.18. 4 Sec. 2. Section 331.504, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 6. Furnish a copy of the proceedings of the board , as 7 approved by the board, required to be published as provided in 8 section 349.18 . 9 Sec. 3. Section 349.18, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 10 to read as follows: 11 1. a. All proceedings of each regular, adjourned, or 12 special meeting of a board of supervisors, including the 13 schedule of bills allowed, shall be published immediately after 14 the adjournment of the meeting. 15 b. All proceedings must be approved by the board of 16 supervisors before publication. Approval must occur in one of 17 the following ways: 18 (1) Approval by the board at the next board of supervisors 19 meeting following the meeting for which the proceedings are to 20 be published. 21 (2) Approval by the chairperson of the board of supervisors 22 prior to the meeting following the meeting for which the 23 proceedings are to be published. 24 Sec. 4. Section 349.18, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 25 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 a. The county auditor shall furnish a copy of the 27 proceedings to be published, within one week following the 28 adjournment approval of the board. The county auditor shall 29 include either a summary of all resolutions or the complete 30 text of resolutions adopted by the board in the furnished copy 31 of the proceedings. As used in this subsection , âsummaryâ 32 means a narrative description of the resolution setting forth 33 the main points of the resolution in a manner calculated to 34 inform the public in a clear and understandable manner the 35 -1- SF 2341 (2) 91 ms/js/mb 1/ 2 S.F. 2341 meaning of the resolution and to provide the public with 1 sufficient notice of the policy stated or action to be taken, 2 as resolved by the board in the resolution. The narrative 3 description shall include the title of the resolution, an 4 accurate and intelligible synopsis of the essential elements 5 of the resolution, a statement that the description is a 6 summary, the location and the normal business hours of the 7 office where the full text of the resolution may be inspected, 8 and the effective date of the resolution. Legal descriptions 9 of property set forth in a resolution shall be described in 10 full. The narrative description shall be written in a clear 11 and coherent manner and shall, to the extent possible, avoid 12 the use of technical or legal terms not generally familiar to 13 the public. When necessary to use technical or legal terms not 14 generally familiar to the public, the narrative description 15 shall include definitions of those terms. 16 -2- SF 2341 (2) 91 ms/js/mb 2/ 2